Utah statutes.
41-6a-511.   Courts to collect and maintain data.

(1)  The state courts shall collect and maintain data necessary to allow sentencing and enhancement decisions to be made in accordance with this part.

(2) (a)  Each justice court shall transmit dispositions electronically to the Department of Public Safety in accordance with the requirement for recertification established by the Judicial Council.

(b)  Immediately upon filling the requirements under Subsection (2)(a), a justice court shall collect and report the same DUI related data elements collected and maintained by the state courts under Subsection (1).

(3)  The department shall maintain an electronic data base for DUI related records and data including the data elements received or collected from the courts under this section.

(4) (a)  The Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice shall prepare an annual report of DUI related data including the following:

(i)  the data collected by the courts under Subsections (1) and (2); and

(ii)  any measures for which data are available to evaluate the profile and impacts of DUI recidivism and to evaluate the DUI related processes of:

(A)  law enforcement;

(B)  adjudication;

(C)  sanctions;

(D)  drivers' license control; and

(E)  alcohol education, assessment, and treatment.

(b)  The report shall be provided to the Judiciary and Transportation Interim Committees no later than the last day of October following the end of the fiscal year for which the report is prepared.

